Utah statutes.
63G-6-303.   Purpose of specifications.
All specifications shall seek to promote overall economy and best use for the
purposes intended and encourage competition in satisfying the state's needs,
and shall not be unduly restrictive.  The requirements of this part regarding
the purposes and nonrestrictiveness of specifications shall apply to all
specifications, including, but not limited to, those prepared by architects,
engineers, designers, and draftsmen for public contracts.
